Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1104
Director of Administrative Services; qualifications.

Any person who is a graduate of an accredited four-year college or university program in public or business administration, arts, or sciences and who has had at least eight years of responsible management experience in development or administration of budgetary and accounting systems, management information systems, or systems and procedures planning, and who is not less than thirty years of age may be appointed as Director of Administrative Services. A masters or higher degree in the fields of public or business administration, economics, or statistics may be substituted for two years of experience as set forth above.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 4, p. 1694;

Laws 1969, c. 805, § 1, p. 3042.